New Jersey, session 222, A4723.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The president of each public institution of higher education shall develop a plan for the achievement of menstrual equity at the institution. The plan shall address the current efforts, needs, and access to menstrual products on campus and identify best practices towards achieving menstrual equity. The president may direct the Campus Hunger Task Force established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2019, c.89 (C.18A:62-62), convene a new task force, or otherwise establish an initiative to develop the plan. b.   No later than six months after the effective date of this act, a comprehensive and sustainable plan towards achieving menstrual equity on campus that is best suited to the needs of the institution shall be established.  The plan shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1) an estimate of the number of students and other individuals in need of free products; (2) suitable locations for free product distribution; (3) any other proposals that would advance the goal of menstrual equity on campus; (4) the projected cost of the plan; and (5) a timeline for implementation of the plan that ensures full implementation by the institution within 12 months of the effective date of this act. The president shall forward the plan to the governing body of the institution, which shall then forward the plan to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). c.   The president of the institution shall implement the plan within 12 months of the effective date of this act. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the institution from taking action towards menstrual equity in advance of the timeline established pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section. d.   As used in this act, menstrual equity means equal and comprehensive access to menstrual hygiene products, which both remove barriers to care and reduces stigma surrounding menstruation. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.